Utah statutes.
53-3-223.5.   Telephonic or live audiovisual testimony at hearings.

In any division hearing authorized under this chapter or Title 41, Chapter 6a, Part 5, Driving Under the Influence and Reckless Driving, the division may permit a party or witness to attend or to testify by telephone or live audiovisual means.



Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

